zh-CN: 图像传感器尺寸: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; 全画幅; 微型三分之四; 其他
el: Μέγεθος αισθητήρα εικόνας: 1; 1,5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Full frame; Micro four thirds; Άλλο
sk-SK: Veľkosť obrazového snímača: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Celý rám; Mikro štyri tretiny; Iné
ko: 이미지 센서 크기: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; 풀 프레임; 마이크로 포서즈; 기타
th: ขนาดเซนเซอร์ภาพ: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; เต็มกรอบ; ไมโครสี่ในสาม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tamanho do sensor de imagem: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Moldura completa; Quatro terços micro; Outro
fi: Kuva-anturin koko: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Full frame; Micro four thirds; Muu
vi: Kích thước cảm biến ảnh: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Toàn khung hình; Micro Four Thirds; Khác
da: Billedsensorstørrelse: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Fuld ramme; Mikro fire tredjedele; Andet
pl: Rozmiar przetwornika obrazu: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Pełna rama; Mikro cztery trzecie; Inne
bg-BG: Размер на сензора за изображение: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Пълен кадър; Микро четири трети; Други
lt-LT: Vaizdo jutiklio dydis: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Visas kadras; „Micro“ keturių trečdalių; Kita
sv: Bildsensorstorlek: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Helbild; MFT; Övrigt
tr: Görüntü Sensörü Boyutu: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Bütün çerçeve; Mikro üçte dört; Diğer
pt-PT: Tamanho do sensor de imagem: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Moldura completa; Micro four thirds; Outro
de: Bildsensorgröße: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Vollrahmen; Micro Four Thirds; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Dimensiune senzor imagine: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Cadru complet; Micro patru treimi; Altele
es: Tamaño del sensor de imagen: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Marco completo; Micro cuatro tercios; Otros
zh-TW: 圖像感測器尺寸: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; 全畫幅; 微 4/3; 其他
ja: イメージセンサーサイズ: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; フルフレーム; マイクロフォーサーズ; その他
sl-SI: Velikost slikovnega tipala: 1; 1,5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Full-frame; MFT; Drugo
nl: Beeldsensorgrootte: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Full frame; Micro Four Thirds; Andere
cs: Velikost obrazového snímače: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Full frame; Mikro čtyři třetiny; Jiné
nb: Bildesensorstørrelse: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Full ramme; Micro four thirds; Annet
hu: Képérzékelő mérete: 1; 1,5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Teljes képkockás; Mikronégyharmados; Egyéb
fr: Taille du capteur d’image: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Cadre complet; Micro Four Thirds; Autre
ru: Размер светочувствительной матрицы: 1; 1,5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Полный кадр; Микро четыре трети; Другой
en: Image sensor size: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Full frame; Micro four thirds; Other
it: Dimensioni del sensore di immagine: 1; 1,5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Cornice intera; Micro quattro terzi; Altro
hr-HR: Veličina senzora slike: 1; 1.5; 1/1.2; 1/1.6; 1/1.63; 1/1.65; 1/1.7; 1/1.8; 1/2; 1/2.3; 1/2.33; 1/2.4; 1/2.5; 1/2.7; 1/2.8; 1/2.9; 1/3; 1/3.1; 1/3.2; 1/4; 1/5.8; 2/3; 4/3; APS-C; Puni okvir; Mikro četiri trećine; Ostalo